Hawaii statutes.
[§196-63] Hawaii green
infrastructure authority. There is established
the Hawaii green infrastructure authority as an instrumentality of the State
comprising five members. The director, the director of finance, and the energy
program administrator of the department shall be
members of the authority. The governor shall appoint the other two members,
pursuant to section 26-34. The director shall be the chairperson of the
authority. The authority shall be placed within the department for
administrative purposes, pursuant to section 26-35;
provided that until the authority is duly constituted,
the department may exercise all powers reserved to the
authority and shall perform all responsibilities of the authority. [L 2013, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next